Oklahoma, session 2025, SB701.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The State Regents for Higher Education may approve functional
exceptions. "Functional exception" means an expansion or exception
to assigned institutional function or mission to permit an
institution of higher education within The State System of Higher
Education to offer courses or degree programs outside the
institution's assigned function or mission to meet unmet workforce
needs.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3213.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3213.1. A. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall make educational program resources at institutions
in The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education available to the
people in the Ponca City area. This program shall be known as the
University Center at Ponca City.
B. The State Regents shall draw upon the educational programs
of institutions best suited to provide the kind of educational
programs needed and shall, in pursuance of Article XIII-A of the
Oklahoma Constitution of Oklahoma and appropriate statutes, set the
standards of education as they relate to the programs operated to
assure that credits earned by students will be fully accepted at
institutions of higher education to which the students may transfer
the credit to apply toward an educational study objective. Northern
Oklahoma College shall have exclusive authority to offer all lower
division courses and programs at the University Center at Ponca City
as listed in the current college catalog of Northern Oklahoma
College.
C. The State Regents may establish appropriate funds and
accounts, including a revolving fund, in the Office of State Finance
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for servicing the
fiscal operations of the University Center at Ponca City. The funds
and accounts shall be subject to the direct supervision, management,
and control of the board of trustees created by subsection D of this
section. The people locally shall provide suitable physical plant
accommodations for the University Center at Ponca City.
ENR. S. B. NO. 701 Page 2

D. There is hereby created a board of nine (9) trustees to be
appointed by the Governor by and with the consent of the Senate to
serve as the administrative agency for the University Center at
Ponca City. The board shall be a body corporate and shall adopt and
use an official seal. The board so created shall have the authority
to submit a budget annually to the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education, administer monies budgeted by the State Regents, provide
educational facilities, recommend courses and programs to be offered
by participating institutions, select a chief executive officer
whose duties include the general coordination of approved programs
and services and the selection of other appropriate nonteaching
personnel. The board of trustees is authorized to expend all monies
allocated to the University Center at Ponca City as may be necessary
to perform the duties and responsibilities imposed upon the board by
this section. For purposes of acquiring and taking title to real
and personal property from sources other than state appropriations,
the board is authorized to enter into contracts and to adopt rules
and regulations pertaining to such actions. The initial nine (9)
members shall serve their terms for the period to which originally
appointed, in numbered positions having dates of expiration
identical to the dates of expiration of the original appointments:
Position No. 1. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2013, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 2. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2014, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 3. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2015, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 4. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2016, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 5. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2017, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 6. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2018, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 7. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2019, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
ENR. S. B. NO. 701 Page 3

Position No. 8. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2020, and each nine (9) years thereafter; and
Position No. 9. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2021, and each nine (9) years thereafter.
The board shall organize and elect a chair, vice-chair, and
secretary annually.
E. The board of trustees may establish and maintain plans for
tenure and retirement of its employees and for payment of deferred
compensation of employees and may provide hospital and medical
benefits, accident, health and life insurance and annuity contracts
for employees and pay for all or part of the cost with funds
available for payment of its operating expenses.
F. The board may establish with the State Treasurer any
accounts as are necessary to operate retirement, deferred
compensation or benefits plans for its employees. The accounts
shall be revolving funds not subject to fiscal year limitations.
Funds deposited in the accounts may be invested in any of the types
of instruments in which the State Treasurer is authorized by law to
invest.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3405.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3405.1. A. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall make resident college credit courses and programs
available to the people of Muskogee.
B. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
provide lower division classes and programs through a branch of
Connors State College as the State Regents shall determine are
appropriate, which shall be established and located in Muskogee.
The branch campus of Connors State College shall be governed by the
Board of Regents for the Oklahoma Agricultural and Mechanical
Colleges and administered through Connors State College.
C. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
provide upper division classes and programs and graduate classes at
ENR. S. B. NO. 701 Page 4

the Masters level through a branch of Northeastern State University
as the State Regents shall determine are appropriate, which shall be
established and located at Muskogee. The branch campus of
Northeastern State University shall be governed by the Board of
Regents of Oklahoma Colleges and administered through Northeastern
State University.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 4662, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4662. A. On January 1, 1999, there shall be
established as a successor to Rogers University in Tulsa a branch
institution of Oklahoma State University which shall be known as
Oklahoma State University/Tulsa Oklahoma State University-Tulsa and
shall offer upper division undergraduate courses and baccalaureate
degree programs as the Oklahoma State Regents of Higher Education
shall determine are appropriate. No later than July 1, 2001, the
Board of Regents for the Oklahoma Agricultural and Mechanical
Colleges, in cooperation with the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education, shall have developed and implemented programs leading to
baccalaureate degrees that can be earned at Oklahoma State
University/Tulsa Oklahoma State University-Tulsa.
B. Beginning with the 2001 - 2002 academic year, degrees earned
at Oklahoma State University/Tulsa Oklahoma State University-Tulsa
shall be designated as awarded by the Oklahoma State Regents for
Higher Education acting through Oklahoma State University; provided
that dual degree programs may be offered at Oklahoma State
University/Tulsa Oklahoma State University-Tulsa and dual degrees
may be awarded through Oklahoma State University and other
institutions.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 4667, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4667. A. On July 1, 2001, there shall be established a
branch of Langston University within the Tulsa metropolitan area
consistent with the statewide plan for Langston University as
provided in Section 6 4666 of this act title. Langston University
shall continue to meet the missions and programs of the Langston
Urban Center in Tulsa. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education are authorized to make upper division undergraduate and
ENR. S. B. NO. 701 Page 5

graduate course offerings at the Langston University Branch in Tulsa
available as the State Regents shall determine are appropriate.
Undergraduate degree programs offered through Oklahoma State
University/Tulsa shall not duplicate those undergraduate degree
programs offered by Langston University Branch in Tulsa, as
determined by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and
Oklahoma State University-Tulsa shall be consistent with and in
furthering implementation of the statewide plan for Langston
University as developed by the State Regents pursuant to Section 6
4666 of this act title and filed with the Office for Civil Rights,
United States Department of Education.
B. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall fund
Langston University at a level not less than its fiscal year 1998
level, and its Education and General Budget shall be held harmless
from reductions in succeeding years. The Oklahoma State Regents for
Higher Education shall allocate funds to Langston University
sufficient to fund full time faculty in Tulsa at a level equal to
seventy percent (70%) of its faculty level that existed in Tulsa in
fiscal year 1998 and adequate building and classroom space which
were funded in fiscal year 1998 in order to carry out all functions
in Tulsa. The Board of Regents for the Oklahoma Agricultural and
Mechanical Colleges shall allocate space for Langston University in
Tulsa.
C. It is the intent of the Legislature that Langston University
be funded at a level consistent with the average allocation and
allotment of the institutions in the regional funding tier as
established by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
D. Beginning with the 2001 - 2002 2001-2002 academic year,
degrees earned at Langston University Branch in Tulsa shall be
designated as awarded by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education acting through Langston University.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 4668, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4668. A. On July 1, 2001, there may be established a
branch of Northeastern State University within the Tulsa
metropolitan area. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education
are authorized to make upper division undergraduate and graduate
ENR. S. B. NO. 701 Page 6

course offerings at the Northeastern State University branch in
Broken Arrow available as the State Regents shall determine are
appropriate. Undergraduate degree programs offered through Oklahoma
State University/Tulsa shall not duplicate those undergraduate
degree programs offered by Northeastern State University in Tulsa,
as determined by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.
B. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall fund
Northeastern State University at a level not less than its fiscal
year 1998 level, and its Education and General Budget shall be held
harmless from reductions in succeeding years.
C. It is the intent of the Legislature that Northeastern State
University be funded at a level consistent with the average
allocation and allotment of the institutions in the regional funding
tier as established by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education.
D. Beginning with the 2001 - 2002 academic year, degrees earned
at the Northeastern State University Branch branch in Tulsa Broken
Arrow shall be designated as awarded by the Oklahoma State Regents
for Higher Education acting through Northeastern State University.
SECTION 7. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 4665, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 701 Page 7

Passed the Senate the 21st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 701 Page 8